Utah statutes.
53-8-106.   Vested with powers of peace officers.

(1)  The commissioner, superintendent, and each member of the Highway Patrol have the powers of peace officers in each county of the state with the exception of the power to serve civil process.

(2)  They may serve criminal process, arrest and prosecute violators of any law of this state, and have the same right as other peace officers to require aid in executing their duties.

(3)  The powers and duties conferred upon the superintendent and members of the Highway Patrol are supplementary to and not a limitation on the powers and duties of other peace officers in the state.

